Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.330

Expenditures authorized—Claims, payment and disposition—Appeals.

The department is authorized to make all expenditures necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter including payments to claimants for compensation as emergency workers and their dependents; to adjust and dispose of all claims submitted by a local compensation board. When medical treatment is necessary, the department is authorized to make medical and compensation payments on an interim basis. Nothing herein shall be construed to mean that the department or the state emergency management council or its officers or agents shall have the final decision with respect to the compensability of any case or the amount of compensation or benefits due, but any emergency worker or his or her dependents shall have the same right of appeal from any order, decision, or award to the same extent as provided in chapter 51.32 RCW.

[ 1986 c 266 s 38; 1984 c 38 s 34; 1979 ex.s. c 268 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 35; 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 72; 1953 c 223 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—Effective dates—1971 ex.s. c 289: See RCW 51.98.060 and 51.98.070.